Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.235

Educator recruitment.

(1) For the purpose of this section, "educator" means a paraeducator, teacher, principal, administrator, superintendent, school counselor, school psychologist, school social worker, school nurse, school physical therapist, school occupational therapist, or school speech-language pathologist or audiologist.

(2) An educational service district may employ a person whose duties are to provide to local school districts the following services related to educator recruitment:

(a) Serve as a liaison between local school districts and educator preparation programs, between their region and other regions in the state, and between the local school districts and agencies that may be helpful in educator recruitment efforts, including the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington professional educator standards board, the paraeducator board, the student achievement council, the state board for community and technical colleges, the state department of veterans affairs, the state military department, and the workforce training and education coordinating board;

(b) Encourage and support local school districts to develop or expand a recruiting Washington teachers program under RCW 28A.415.370, a career and technical education careers in education program, or an alternative route teacher certification program under chapter 28A.660 RCW;

(c) Provide outreach to community members who may be interested in becoming educators, including high school and college students, subject matter experts, and former military personnel and their spouses;

(d) Support persons interested in becoming educators by providing resources and assistance with navigating transition points on the path to a career in education; and

(e) Provide resources and technical assistance to local school districts on best hiring processes and practices.

(3) A person employed to provide the services described in subsection (2) of this section must be reflective of, and have an understanding of, the local community.

[ 2019 c 295 s 102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 295: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 8, 2019]." [ 2019 c 295 s 403.]

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: "(1) The legislature finds that discrete efforts are being made at state and local levels to address the educator shortage, but these efforts need to be streamlined and performed in concert, in order to enhance the effect of these recruitment and retention strategies.

(2) The legislature also reaffirms that excellent, effective educators and educator leaders are essential to the state's ongoing efforts to establish a world-class, globally competitive education system. As acknowledged in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2261 (chapter 548, Laws of 2009), "Teachers, principals, and administrators must be provided with access to the opportunities they need to gain the knowledge and skills that will enable them to be increasingly successful in their classroom and schools. A system that clearly defines, supports, measures, and recognizes effective teaching and leadership is one of the most important investments to be made."

(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to seize the challenges presented by the educator workforce shortage in Washington to build the capacity of the education system to attract, retain, support, and sustain successful educators through:

(a) Intentional recruitment strategies;

(b) Expanding educator training programs;

(c) Focused financial incentives, assistance, and supports;

(d) Responsive and responsible retention strategies; and

(e) Deeper systems evaluation." [ 2019 c 295 s 1.]

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: "(1) The legislature finds that effective educators who share their love of learning inspire students to enter into the education profession. The legislature further finds that every category and level of educator should support and inspire the next generation into careers in education.

(2) The legislature finds that a comprehensive effort is needed to repair the disjointed system for attracting persons into certificated educator professions. The legislature acknowledges that Washington is facing a short-term recruitment problem with the immediate need to fill classroom vacancies, but recognizes that it must also solve its long-term recruitment problem by creating a pipeline of interested persons entering into, and remaining in, the educator workforce.

(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to support a multipronged grow-your-own initiative to develop persons from the community, which includes programs that target middle and high school students, paraeducators, military personnel, and career changers who are subject matter experts, and that supports these persons to become educators. The initiative includes:

(a) Improvements to existing programs and activities, including the recruiting Washington teachers program, the high school career and technical education course called careers in education, and the alternative route teacher certification programs; and

(b) Development and implementation of additional programs and activities, including the coordination of existing resources that attract persons with needed skills and abilities, improving standards of practice, and reviewing barriers to recruitment." [ 2019 c 295 s 101.]

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.